District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.81

Effect of Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952.

Where any provision of this chapter, or any amendment made by this chapter, refers to an office or agency abolished by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952, such reference shall be deemed to be the office, agency, or officer exercising the functions of the office or agency so abolished.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 139, ch. 222, § 81
1981 Ed., § 40-483.
1973 Ed., § 40-498a.